Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 3
OFFENSES

Cross references:

For penalty for dumping trash on highway, see § 18-4-511; for regulation of vehicles and traffic generally, see article 4 of title 42.

43-5-301. Obstructing highway - penalty.

No person or corporation shall erect any fence, house, or other structure or dig pits or holes in or upon any highway, or place thereon or cause or allow to be placed thereon any stones, timber, or trees or any obstruction whatsoever. No person or corporation shall tear down, burn, or otherwise damage any bridge of any highway, or cause wastewater or the water from any ditch, road, drain, flume, agricultural crop sprinkler system, or other source to flow or fall upon any road or highway so as to damage the same or to cause a hazard to vehicular traffic. Any person or corporation so offending commits a civil infraction and shall also be liable to any person, unit of government, or corporation in a civil action for any damages resulting therefrom.

Source:

L. 1883:

p. 261, § 36.

G.S.

§ 2988.

L. 1885:

p. 325, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5826.

C.L.

§ 1280.

CSA:

C. 143, § 34.

CRS 53:

§ 120-4-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-4-1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1775, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3326, § 780, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For damaging road, ditch, or flume, see § 7-42-109; for the penalty for cutting or breaking ditch or flume, see § 37-89-101; for obstructing highway or other passageway, see § 18-9-107; for the penalty for a civil infraction, see § 18-1.3-503.

43-5-302. Not to dam stream - penalty.

No person or corporation shall dam the waters of any stream so as to cause the same to overflow any road or damage or weaken the abutments, walls, or embankments of any bridge of any highway. Any person or corporation violating any of the provisions of this section shall forfeit the sum of fifty dollars to the county and shall be liable to any person or corporation in a civil action for any damages resulting therefrom.

Source:

L. 1883:

p. 261, § 37.

G.S.

§ 2989.

R.S. 08:

§ 5828.

C.L.

§ 1282.

CSA:

C. 143, § 36.

CRS 53:

§ 120-4-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-4-2.

43-5-303. Overflowing highways - penalty.

A person or corporation shall not repeatedly, willfully, or negligently cause or allow water to flow, fall, or sprinkle from any ditch, lateral, canal, waste ditch, reservoir, pond, drain, flume, or agricultural crop sprinkler system upon any public road or highway so as to damage the same or to cause a hazard to vehicular traffic. Any person or corporation so offending commits a civil infraction. Each day that water is so allowed to flow upon any public road or highway shall be deemed a separate offense. Agricultural crop sprinkler systems upon which generally accepted devices are installed or preventive practices are carried out and when due diligence has been exercised to prevent the end gun from discharging water upon the highway shall not be deemed to be in violation of this section, nor shall acts of God, including but not limited to wind, be deemed a violation of this section.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 405, § 1.

C.L.

§ 1283.

CSA:

C. 143, § 37.

CRS 53:

§ 120-4-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-4-3.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1776, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3326, § 781, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For civil liability for damages, see § 43-5-302; for the penalty for a civil infraction, see § 18-1.3-503.

43-5-304. Jurisdiction.

The county court of the county wherein any of the offenses described in sections 43-5-301 and 43-5-303 may be committed shall have jurisdiction of complaints coming within the provisions of sections 43-5-301 and 43-5-303.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 405, § 2.

C.L.

§ 1284.

CSA:

C. 143, § 38.

CRS 53:

§ 120-4-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-4-4.

L. 64:

p. 309, § 273.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1776, § 4, effective July 1.

43-5-305. Owners construct culverts - penalty.

Any person or corporation owning or constructing any ditch, race, drain, or flume in, upon, or across any highway shall keep the highway open for safe and convenient travel by constructing culverts, bridges, or similar structures over such ditch, race, drain, or flume. When any ditch is constructed across, in, or upon any highway, the person owning or constructing such ditch shall construct a culvert, bridge, or similar structure long enough to conduct the water from shoulder to shoulder from such road or highway or of such greater length as the board of county commissioners having jurisdiction thereover may require, plans for said culvert, bridge, or similar structure having been approved in advance by said board of county commissioners. The board of county commissioners shall maintain said culvert, bridge, or similar structure after construction, in accordance with the provisions of section 37-84-106, C.R.S.

Any person or corporation who fails to construct a culvert, bridge, or similar structure across any ditch, race, drain, or flume, within a time limit to be specified by the board of county commissioners when the plans therefor are approved by said board as provided in subsection (1) of this section, shall forfeit the sum of twenty-five dollars to the county for each day of failure to construct such bridge, culvert, or similar structure together with the cost of construction thereof. Proceeds from such penalty shall be paid into the road fund of the district. It is the duty of the road supervisor of the district to construct such culvert, bridge, or similar structure if the owner of such ditch, race, drain, or flume fails to comply.

Source:

L. 1883:

p. 261, § 38.

G.S.

§ 2990.

L. 1885:

p. 324, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5829.

C.L.

§ 1285.

CSA:

C. 143, § 39.

L. 47:

p. 747, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 120-4-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-4-5.

43-5-306. Transporting heavy machines.

It is the duty of all persons, associations, and corporations operating threshing machines or vehicles or using the public roads for transporting such machines or other heavy machinery to use a sufficient number of heavy planks, wherever necessary, to protect all sidewalks, bridges, culverts, and causeways from being broken by said threshing machines or other heavy machinery in passing over the same.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 410, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5831.

C.L.

§ 1287.

CSA:

C. 143, § 41.

CRS 53:

§ 120-4-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-4-6.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1642, § 60, effective July 1.

43-5-307. Injury to highway - penalty.

If any person, association, or corporation purposely destroys or injures any sidewalk, bridge, culvert, or causeway, or removes any of the timber or plank thereof, or obstructs the same, he shall forfeit a sum of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than three hundred dollars and shall be liable for all damages occasioned thereby and for all necessary cost for rebuilding or repairing the same. All forfeitures and sums of money recovered under this section and section 43-5-306 shall be turned into the county road fund.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 410, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 5832.

C.L.

§ 1288.

CSA:

C. 143, § 42.

CRS 53:

§ 120-4-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-4-7.

43-5-308. Flagpersons - definition - penalty.

A person shall not fail or refuse to obey the visible instructions, signals, or direction displayed or given by a flagperson. A person who violates this subsection (1)(a) commits a class A traffic infraction.

If a driver fails to comply with the flagperson's instructions, the flagperson or any other person with information as to the identity of the driver or the license plate number of the driver's vehicle may, and if practicable shall, promptly relay the information to the appropriate law enforcement agency.

Only a trained person may provide temporary traffic control or direction within any highway, road, or street maintenance or construction work area as a flagperson.

The department shall authorize public and private entities to conduct flagperson certification training and shall develop and provide, at cost, examination and training materials that authorized entities must use in conducting flagperson certification.

While directing traffic, a flagperson shall wear high-visibility garments and display an official hand signal device prescribed in the state traffic control manual adopted by the department pursuant to section 42-4-104, C.R.S., or its supplement.

A flagperson shall abide by the Colorado manual of uniform traffic control devices and shall not use any device that might distract the flagperson's vision, hearing, or attention while directing traffic.

As used in this section, "flagperson" means a person:

Eighteen years of age or older;

Trained by an entity authorized by the department;

Employed by the department, a department contractor, a political subdivision of the state, or a contractor of a political subdivision; and

Acting in his or her official capacity while performing work within a temporary traffic control zone.

This section does not apply to law enforcement personnel while performing official law enforcement duties.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-060), ch. 70, p. 298, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3327, § 782, effective March 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 22-1229), ch. 68, p. 350, § 45, effective March 1.

Editor's note:

Section 47 of chapter 68 (HB 22-1229), Session Laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act amending this section is effective March 1, 2022, but the governor did not approve the act until April 7, 2022.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class A traffic infraction, see § 42-4-1701 (3).